District of Columbia statutes.
7-301

Mayor to issue rules.

The Mayor may, upon the advice of the Commissioner of Public Health and pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to prevent and monitor the occurrence of cancer in the District of Columbia.

July 27, 1951, 65 Stat. 124, ch. 241, § 1
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 2(a), 32 DCR 7276
1981 Ed., § 6-1201.
1973 Ed., § 6-1301.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(d) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(e) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(f) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 402(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 506(g) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 506(h) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-83, see Mayor’s Order 86-165, September 19, 1986.
Delegation of authority pursuant to the “Preventive Health Services Amendment Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 98-141, August 20,